Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 70 The College Crusade Scholarship [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-70-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “College Crusade Scholarship Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.

16-70-2.
Legislative findings.

It is found and declared as follows:

Rhode Island must continue to develop the educational and career and technical skills of its students for its continued economic development, prosperity, and for maintaining and improving its quality of life.

The present and future workforce requires ever higher levels of educational and career and technical training in order to improve the economic prosperity of our state and nation.

With regard to high school graduation and college going rates, the state’s low-income students continue to lag behind their peers.

A comprehensive, long-range strategy is essential if this critical problem is to be addressed. This plan will need to incorporate the elements of programs that have demonstrated success in supporting underrepresented, first-generation and low-income students, including appropriate incentives to encourage and support these students toward the goal of graduating from school and pursuing and completing higher levels of education and training.

This plan will require the involvement and support of families, educators, and the community at large, working closely with underserved students, and must provide students with a well-organized and directed advisory program to include intensive orientation and training of these advisors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.

16-70-3.
Program for the support of the college crusade established.

The council on postsecondary education is empowered to establish and provide as part of the operation of the office of the postsecondary commissioner methods and procedures for the state’s support of the college crusade scholarship and provide financial and technical assistance as needed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.

16-70-4.
Council on postsecondary education support program — Powers and duties.

The council on postsecondary education shall have the following powers and duties:

To prepare with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education and to present annually to the state budget officer in accordance with §

35-3-4

, as part of the state higher education budget, a line-item budget request specifically designated as the state’s share of support for the college crusade of Rhode Island. The budget shall be designated as a specific, line-item budget request and shall be presented as part of the budget of the postsecondary commissioner.

To provide, through its office of the postsecondary commissioner, the authority to designate the college crusade of Rhode Island, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization registered with the Rhode Island secretary of state, as the entity that will administer and operate all program services and manage scholarship resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.

16-70-5.
Budget and appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums as it deems necessary as the state’s share for the support and maintenance of the college crusade, including operational and scholarship support, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the appropriations upon receipt by him or her of the proper voucher the office of the postsecondary commissioner may provide. The office of the postsecondary commissioner shall present the voucher to the state controller no later than the last day of the first month of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made and this appropriation shall be remitted to the accounts of the college crusade of Rhode Island by the state treasurer no later than the last day of the second month of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.

16-70-6.
Audit requirements.

The college crusade of Rhode Island shall complete an annual audit completed by prior to the employment of private auditors. Audit work papers of the private auditors shall be made available upon request to the auditor general and/or the director of administration for their review, at the completion of the audit. The audit report shall be furnished to the auditor general and the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 18; P.L. 2017, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 239, § 2.